Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Chapter 10

Alcohol-Related Injuries

57-10-101. Proximate cause.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that the consumption of any alcoholic beverage or beer rather than the furnishing of any alcoholic beverage or beer is the proximate cause of injuries inflicted upon another by an intoxicated person.

Acts 1986, ch. 519, § 1.

Law Reviews.

One Too Many: Sellers, Servers Must Know “How Much Is Too Much” to Avoid Alcohol Related Injuries (Mike Faulk), 43 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2007).

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

57-10-102. Standard of proof.

Notwithstanding §57-10-101, no judge or jury may pronounce a judgment awarding damages to or on behalf of any party who has suffered personal injury or death against any person who has sold any alcoholic beverage or beer, unless such jury of twelve (12) persons has first ascertained beyond a reasonable doubt that the sale by such person of the alcoholic beverage or beer was the proximate cause of the personal injury or death sustained and that such person:

Sold the alcoholic beverage or beer to a person known to be under the age of twenty-one (21) years and such person caused the personal injury or death as the direct result of the consumption of the alcoholic beverage or beer so sold; or

Sold the alcoholic beverage or beer to a visibly intoxicated person and such person caused the personal injury or death as the direct result of the consumption of the alcoholic beverage or beer so sold.

Acts 1986, ch. 519, § 2; 2009, ch. 492, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 492, § 2 provided that the act, which amended §57-10-102(2), shall apply to any cause of action accruing on or after June 23, 2009.

Cross-References. Alcohol abuse prevention, title 33, ch. 10, part 4.

Law Reviews.

One Too Many: Sellers, Servers Must Know “How Much Is Too Much” to Avoid Alcohol Related Injuries (Mike Faulk), 43 Tenn. B.J. 12 (2007).